Massachusetts, session 194th, H3330.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4A of Chapter40 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by deleting in line 8 after the word “selectmen” the words “,
and ”
SECTION 2. Said section of said chapter is hereby further amended by adding in line 9
after the word “committee” the following words: , in a municipal light plant by the board or
commission;
SECTION 3. Said section of said chapter is further amended by deleting in line 28 the
word “or”
SECTION 4. Said section of said chapter is further amended by deleting in line 29 “.”
and by adding the following words: , or a municipal light plant established under chapter 164 or
by special law.
of 2

Section 4. Section 47B of Chapter 164 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(b) Any municipality acting by and through its municipal light board may provide
services and assistance to any municipal or state utility, tribal utility as defined in 25 CFR §
169.2, or any other publicly-owned or operated utility, whether located inside or outside of the
Commonwealth, and governmental units as defined in section 4A of chapter 40, to construct,
install, alter, operate, maintain or repair utility poles and conduit, wires, cables, and equipment,
and streetlights and traffic signals to the same extent such municipality acting by and through its
municipal light board may provide such services within its service territory. Any such
municipality acting by and through its municipal light board may sell, rent, or lease merchandise,
equipment, fixtures, utensils and chattels of any description related to the provision of such
services. Any employee providing such services entered into between the municipality acting by
and through its municipal light board and such other public entity shall be subject to the
provisions of chapter thirty-two, sections one to twenty-eight, inclusive, and shall have the same
rights and privileges thereunder, as if performing the same duties within the scope of his
employment including voluntary assignments.
of 2